Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1547
Amercement; amount; limit.

When the cause of amercement is for refusing to pay over money collected as aforesaid, the said sheriff or other officer shall not be amerced in a greater sum than the amount so withheld, with ten percent thereon.

R.S.1867, Code § 515, p. 482;

R.S.1913, § 8094;

C.S.1922, § 9030;

C.S.1929, § 20-1548;

R.S.1943, § 25-1547.